Hawaii statutes.
§321-42 Tumor clinics. The department
of health may assist in the operation of tumor clinics which are now
established or may be established in the State. This assistance may consist of
furnishing statistical information on the incidence or prevalence of tumors of
various kinds in the State. Other assistance, such as clerical or stenographic
help, may be furnished as needed. In all activities under this section, the
department may consult and cooperate with the Hawaii State Medical Association
and the Hawaii Cancer Society.

Insofar as is needed the department may assist
tumor clinics or private physicians in the follow-up of tumor cases for the
purpose of determining the progress of the disease or for further treatment.
This part of the program shall be limited to those cases on which follow-up is
requested by the attending physicians, and it shall also be limited by the
funds which are provided for this purpose. [L 1949, c 79, §3; RL 1955, §46-32;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §321-42]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next